Utah statutes.
79-2-204.   Division directors -- Appointment -- Removal -- Jurisdiction of executive director.

(1) (a)  The chief administrative officer of a division within the department is a director appointed by the executive director with the concurrence of the board having policy authority for the division.

(b)  The director of a division may be removed from office by the executive director.

(c)  The appointment and term of office of the state engineer, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this section, shall be in accordance with Section 73-2-1.

(2) (a)  The executive director has administrative jurisdiction over a division director for the purpose of implementing department policy as established by the division's board.

(b)  The executive director may:

(i)  consolidate personnel and service functions in the divisions to effectuate efficiency and economy in the operations of the department;

(ii)  establish a departmental services division to perform service functions; and

(iii)  employ law enforcement officers and special function officers within the department that have all of the powers of a conservation officer and law enforcement officer, with the exception of the power to serve civil process.

